Texas, session 892, SB14.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter B, Chapter 395, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Section 395.0231 to read as follows: Sec. 395.0231.  CONSERVATION AND REUSE CREDITS AGAINST WATER AND WASTEWATER FEES. (a)  A political subdivision shall provide a credit against water and wastewater impact fees otherwise assessed to a development to a builder or developer for the construction, contribution, or dedication of an eligible facility, system, or product that results in water reuse, conservation, or savings. (b)  A facility, system, or product eligible for a credit under this section includes a facility, system, or product that: (1)  reduces per service unit water consumption, supply requirements, or necessary treatment and distribution infrastructure per service unit; (2)  decreases the need of wastewater collection and treatment facilities per service unit; (3)  diminishes the demand for stormwater and drainage facilities per service unit; or (4)  integrates practices or technologies that achieve water efficiency, reuse, or conservation performance that exceeds standard compliance requirements. (c)  A political subdivision that provides a credit under this section shall establish procedures for: (1)  calculating and applying the credits in a fair and consistent manner; and (2)  reviewing and approving credits under this section. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect January 1, 2026. ______________________________ ______________________________ President of the Senate Speaker of the House I hereby certify that S.B. No. 14 passed the Senate on August 18, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 30, Nays 0. ______________________________ Secretary of the Senate I hereby certify that S.B. No. 14 passed the House on August 26, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 133, Nays 6, one present not voting. ______________________________ Chief Clerk of the House Approved: ______________________________ Date ______________________________ Governor